vi: Hệ thống thấu kính kính bảo hộ đua xe: Hệ thống thay ống kính nhanh; Hỗ trợ cuộn phim; Ống kính tiêu chuẩn (không có phim xé); Tương thích phim xé + cuộn phim; Hỗ trợ phim xé (có chốt); Khác
tr: Yarış gözlüğü lens sistemi: Hızlı lens değiştirme sistemi; Roll-off uyumlu; Standart lens (tear-off yok); Tear-off ve roll-off uyumlu; Tear-off uyumlu (pimler); Diğer
sv: Linssystem för racingglasögon: Snabbytessystem för lins; Förberedd för roll-off; Standardlins (inga tear-offs); Kompatibel med tear-off + roll-off; Förberedd för tear-off (piggar); Övrigt
hu: Versenyszemüveg lencserendszere: Gyorscserés lencserendszer; Roll-off kompatibilis; Normál lencse (nincs letéphető fólia); Letépőfólia + roll-off kompatibilis; Letépőfólia előkészítés (pöckök); Egyéb
ro-RO: Sistem de lentile pentru ochelari de curse: Sistem de schimbare rapidă a lentilelor; Compatibil roll-off; Lentilă standard (fără tear-off); Compatibil tear-off + roll-off; Compatibil tear-off (cu suporturi); Altele
hr-HR: Sustav leća za trkaće naočale: Sustav za brzu zamjenu leća; Spremno za roll-off; Standardna leća (bez folija tear-off); Kompatibilno s folijama tear-off i roll-off; Spremno za tear-off (klinovi); Ostalo
zh-CN: 赛车护目镜镜片系统: 快拆镜片系统; 兼容卷膜; 标准镜片（无手撕膜）; 兼容手撕膜和卷膜; 兼容手撕膜（带柱）; 其他
da: Racerbrille-linsesystem: Quick-change-linsesystem; Klar til roll-off; Standardlinse (ingen tear-offs); Kompatibel med tear-off og roll-off; Klar til tear-off (posts); Andet
sl-SI: Sistem leč za dirkalna očala: Sistem za hitro menjavo leč; Pripravljeno na odvijanje (roll-off); Standardna leča (brez folij tear-off); Združljivo s folijami tear-off in roll-off; Pripravljeno na folije tear-off (čepi); Drugo
bg-BG: Система от лещи за състезателни очила: Система за бърза смяна на лещите; Готовност за roll-off; Стандартна леща (без tear-off); Съвместимост с tear-off и roll-off; Готовност за tear-off (щифтове); Друго
nb: Linsesystem for racingbriller: Hurtigskiftesystem for linse; Klargjort for roll-off; Standardlinse (ingen tear-off); Kompatibel med tear-off og roll-off; Klargjort for tear-off (fester); Annet
el: Σύστημα φακών αγωνιστικών γυαλιών: Σύστημα γρήγορης αλλαγής φακών; Συμβατό με σύστημα Roll-off; Τυπικός φακός (χωρίς tear-offs); Συμβατό με Tear-off και Roll-off; Συμβατό με σύστημα Tear-off (στηρίγματα); Άλλο
th: ระบบเลนส์แว่นตาแข่งรถ: ระบบเลนส์เปลี่ยนด่วน; รองรับ Roll-off; เลนส์มาตรฐาน (ไม่มีแผ่นฟิล์ม Tear-off); รองรับแผ่นฟิล์ม Tear-off และ Roll-off; รองรับแผ่นฟิล์ม Tear-off (มีหมุด); อื่นๆ
ko: 레이싱 고글 렌즈 체계: 퀵 체인지 렌즈 시스템; 롤오프 호환; 표준 렌즈(티어오프 없음); 티어오프 + 롤오프 호환; 티어오프 호환(포스트); 기타
es: Sistema de lentes para gafas de carreras: Sistema de cambio rápido de lentes; Preparado para roll-off; Lente estándar (sin tear-offs); Compatible con tear-off y roll-off; Preparado para tear-off (postes); Otro
de: Linsensystem der Rennbrille: Schnellwechselsystem für Gläser; Roll-Off-kompatibel; Standard-Visier (keine Abreißvisiere); Abreiß- + Roll-Off-kompatibel; Abreißvisier-kompatibel (Pins); Sonstige
pt-PT: Sistema de lentes dos óculos de corrida: Sistema de lentes de substituição rápida; Preparado para sistema roll-off; Lente padrão (sem tear-offs); Compatível com tear-off e roll-off; Preparado para tear-off (pinos); Outro
ja: レーシングゴーグルレンズシステム: クイックチェンジレンズシステム; ロールオフ対応; 標準レンズ (ティアオフなし); ティアオフ + ロールオフ対応; ティアオフ対応 (ポスト); その他
en: Racing goggles lens system: Quick-change lens system; Roll-off ready; Standard lens (no tear-offs); Tear-off + roll-off compatible; Tear-off ready (posts); Other
nl: Racebril lenssysteem: Systeem voor snelle lenswisseling; Geschikt voor roll-off; Standaardlens (geen tear-offs); Compatibel met tear-off + roll-off; Geschikt voor tear-off (posts); Overig
cs: Systém čoček závodních brýlí: Systém rychlé výměny čoček; Příprava na roll-off; Standardní čočka (bez odtrhávacích fólií); Kompatibilní s odtrhávacími a roll-off fóliemi; Příprava pro odtrhávací fólie (čepy); Jiné
it: Sistema di lenti per occhiali da corsa: Sistema di cambio rapido della lente; Predisposto per sistema roll-off; Lente standard (senza lenti a strappo); Compatibile con lenti a strappo + roll-off; Predisposto per lenti a strappo (perni); Altro
pl: System soczewek gogli wyścigowych: System szybkiej wymiany szybek; Zgodność z systemem roll-off; Standardowa szybka (bez zrywek); Zgodność z systemami tear-off (zrywki) i roll-off; Zgodność z systemem tear-off (zrywki); Inne
sk-SK: Systém šošoviek pretekárskych okuliarov: Systém rýchlej výmeny skiel; Príprava pre roll-off; Štandardné sklo (bez trhačiek); Kompatibilné s trhačkami a roll-off; Príprava pre trhačky (kolíky); Iné
ru: Система линз гоночных очков: Система быстрой смены линз; Поддержка Roll-off; Стандартная линза (без отрывных пленок); Совместимость с Tear-off и Roll-off; Поддержка Tear-off (крепления); Другое
lt-LT: Lenktyninių akinių lęšių sistema: Greito lęšių keitimo sistema; Paruošta „Roll-off“ sistemai; Standartinis lęšis (be nuplėšiamų plėvelių); Suderinama su nuplėšiamomis plėvelėmis ir „Roll-off“; Paruošta nuplėšiamoms plėvelėms (su kaiščiais); Kita
pt-BR: Óculos de corrida sistema de lente: Sistema de troca rápida de lentes; Compatível com roll-off; Lente padrão (sem tear-offs); Compatível com tear-off + roll-off; Compatível com tear-off (pinos); Outro
zh-TW: 賽車護目鏡鏡片系統: 快拆鏡片系統; 支援捲動式膠片; 標準鏡片 (無快撕膠片); 相容快撕 + 捲動式膠片; 支援快撕膠片 (含扣柱); 其他
fi: Kilpalasien linssijärjestelmä: Pikavaihtojärjestelmä (linssi); Valmius roll-off-kalvoille; Vakiolinssi (ei repäisykalvoja); Yhteensopiva repäisy- ja roll-off-kalvojen kanssa; Valmius repäisykalvoille (tapit); Muu
fr: Système d’écran du masque de course: Système de changement rapide de lentille; Prêt pour roll-off; Lentille standard (sans tear-off); Compatible tear-off et roll-off; Prêt pour tear-off (tiges); Autre